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DTC P 1780/97NeutralStartSwitchMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The neutral start switch detects the shift lever position and sends signals to the engine ECU.
The engine ECU receives signals (NSW, R, D, 2 and L) from the neutral start switch. When the signal is not
sent to the engine ECU from the neutral start switch, the engine ECU judges that the shift lever is in D range.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

2 or more switches are ON simultaneously for N, 2 and
L positions.
(2−tripdetection logic)

Sh t i t l t t it h i i t
P1780/97 When driving under conditions (a) and (b) for 30 seconds or

more, the neutral start switch is ON (N position).
(2−tripdetection logic)
(a) Vehicle speed: 70 km/h (44 mph) or more
(b)Enginespeed: 1,500 − 2,500 rpm

SShort inneutral start switchcircuit
SNeutral start switch
SEngineECU
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*1:Only forEurope,Turkey
*2: Except Europe, Turkey
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Read PNP, REVERSE, 2ND and LOW signals.

When using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect a hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and hand−held tester main

switch ON.
CHECK:
Shift lever into the P, R, D, N, 2 and L ranges, and read the PNP,
REVERSE, 2ND and LOW signals on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Shift position Signal

2 2ND OFF � ON

L LOW OFF � ON

R REVERSE OFF � ON

P, N PNP SW OFF � ON

When not using hand−held tester:
PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals NSW, R, D, 2 and L of en-
gine ECU and body ground when the shift lever is shifted to the
following ranges.
OK:

HINT:
The voltage will drop slightly due to lighting up the back up light.

OK Check and replace the engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .

NG
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2 Check neutral start switch.

PREPARATION:
Remove the neutral start switch connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal shown below when the
shift lever is moved to each range.
OK:

Shift Position Terminal No. to continuity

P 6 − 9 1 − 3

R 2 − 3 −

N 6 − 9 3 − 5

D 3 − 7 −

2 3 − 4 −

L 3 − 8 −

NG Replace the neutral start switch.

OK

Repair or replace harness and connector between battery and neutral start switch, neutral start
switch and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .


